Washington statutes.
RCW 7.75.050

Confidentiality of centers' files, etc.—Exception—Privileged communications.

Regardless of any provision to the contrary in *chapter 42.17 RCW, all memoranda, work notes or products, or case files of centers established under this chapter are confidential and privileged and are not subject to disclosure in any judicial or administrative proceeding unless the court or administrative tribunal determines that the materials were submitted by a participant to the center for the purpose of avoiding discovery of the material in a subsequent proceeding. In all other respects, chapter 7.07 RCW, shall govern the privilege and confidentiality to be accorded to communications made in conjunction with a mediation conducted by a dispute resolution center established under this chapter.

[ 2005 c 172 s 16; 1984 c 258 s 505.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Provisions in chapter 42.17 RCW relating to public disclosure were recodified in chapter 42.56 RCW by 2005 c 274.

Short title—Effective date—2005 c 172: See RCW 7.07.900 and 7.07.904.

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.